Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1404
Apprentice, defined.

Apprentice means a person registered with the department as an apprentice who is completing a twelve-month apprenticeship under the supervision of a licensed funeral director and embalmer practicing in the State of Nebraska. The licensed funeral director and embalmer is responsible for all funeral assists and embalmings completed by the apprentice.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 540.